Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201118-1742
Handicapped
parking; rules and regulations.

(1) This section applies until the implementation date designated
by the Director of Motor Vehicles under section 60-3,113.01.

(2) The
Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to fulfill any duties and obligations as provided in sections 18-1736
to 18-1741.07.

Laws 1995, LB 593, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 12.
August 27, 2011